District of Columbia statutes.
34-903

Commission to keep informed of business conduct of utilities.

The Commission shall keep itself informed as to the manner and method in which the business of all public utilities is conducted, and shall have the right to obtain from any public utility all necessary information to enable the Commission to perform its duties.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 982, ch. 150, § 8, par. 33

Cross References

Utility records, requirements, see § 34-1109 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-603.
1973 Ed., § 43-403.